Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-2059
Governmental
body; powers.

A political subdivision, state agency,
or other governmental entity which owns or operates a hospital or hospital
health service may, relative to the delivery
of health care services:

(1) Enter into agreements with other health care providers, both governmental and nongovernmental, to
share services or provide a tangible benefit to the hospital and into other
cooperative ventures;

(2) Join or sponsor membership in organizations or associations
intended to benefit the hospital or hospitals in general;

(3) Enter into contractual joint ventures with other
governmental hospitals and health care organizations or nonprofit hospitals
and health care organizations when entering into such a joint venture provides
a tangible benefit to the residents of the political subdivision, state agency,
or other governmental entity that owns or operates a hospital or health service;

(4) Hold a
membership interest in a nonprofit corporation when holding such interest
provides a tangible benefit to the residents of the political subdivision,
state agency, or other governmental entity that owns or operates a hospital
or health service;

(5) Have
members of its governing authority or its officers or administrators serve
without pay as directors or officers of any such venture;

(6) Offer, directly or indirectly,
products and services of the hospital or any such venture to the general public; and

(7) Acquire, erect, staff,
equip, or operate one or more medical office buildings, clinic buildings,
or other buildings or parts thereof for medical services both within and outside the jurisdiction of the political
subdivision, state agency, or other governmental entity. Such
buildings or parts may be freestanding facilities or additions to or parts
of an existing hospital or health care facility. Unless the political subdivision, state agency, or other governmental
entity declares otherwise, the building or parts shall be considered an addition
or improvement to the existing facilities. The political subdivision, state agency, or other governmental
entity may lease all or part of such building to one or more health care practitioners
or groups of health care practitioners or otherwise allow health care practitioners
the use thereof on such terms as the political
subdivision, state agency, or other governmental entity deems
appropriate. Such lease or other use shall not be required to comply with
public bidding requirements or approval of the electorate.

Laws 1985, LB 61, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 77;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 430;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 14.